Nebraska, session 109, LB48.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1)(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall
establish a Family Resource and Juvenile Assessment Center Pilot Program in
cities of the metropolitan class areas.
(b) The pilot program shall: (i) Operate twenty-four hours a day, seven
days a week, (ii) be developed in partnership with local grassroots
organizations, community stakeholders, and advisors representing youth and
families impacted by the juvenile justice system, and (iii) terminate five
years after the operative date of this act.
(2) A Family Resource and Juvenile Assessment Center means a facility
designed to provide support, assessment, and intervention services for youth
and families involved in, or at risk of, entering the juvenile justice system.
The goal of the centers is to offer comprehensive, community-based solutions
that address underlying issues contributing to juvenile delinquency, including
family dynamics, mental health, substance abuse, and educational challenges.
Sec. 2. The pilot program established pursuant to section 1 of this act
shall:
(1) Provide comprehensive support resources to prevent youth from entering
or escalating within the juvenile justice system;
(2) Minimize individual and community harm by addressing issues before
they lead to greater involvement with social services, family services, and
adult criminal justice systems; and
(3) Foster community trust and engagement by integrating culturally
relevant services delivered by, and for, the communities served.
Sec. 3. (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall designate a
designation process for family resource and juvenile assessment centers to
ensure adherence to high-quality standards in service delivery, staff
qualifications, and organizational effectiveness.
(2) A center seeking designation shall complete a comprehensive self-
assessment based on the national Standards of Quality for Family Strengthening
and Support or a similar benchmark framework and shall submit an application
and the self-assessment to the department for review.
(3) The department shall conduct site visits and staff interviews as part
of the review process to verify self-assessment findings and confirm compliance
with designation standards.
(4) A center that meets the designation criteria will receive official
designation. A center that does not meet the designation criteria shall receive
feedback and technical assistance so that such center may improve and reapply
for designation.
(5) Two centers shall be selected for the pilot program established
pursuant to section 1 of this act.
Sec. 4. To receive designation as a family resource and juvenile
assessment center under section 3 of this act, an applicant shall meet the
following criteria: (1) Offer a range of core services, including parenting
support, youth counseling, economic success initiatives, early childhood
programs, conflict resolution, mental health services, and substance abuse
prevention; (2) employ professionals trained in family support principles,
cultural competency, trauma-informed care, and the strengthening families
framework; (3) develop partnerships with local grassroots organizations to
provide culturally relevant services, outreach, and trust-building within the
community; (4) demonstrate a clear, effective organizational framework that
supports service delivery, continuous quality improvement, and sustainable
operations; and (5) implement data collection processes to assess service
impact and outcomes for youth and families, ensuring program adjustments based
on feedback.
Sec. 5. (1) Each family resource and juvenile assessment center shall
host multiple community providers, grassroots organizations, and embedded
community navigators to assess and serve the immediate and ongoing needs of
youth and families.
(2) Each center shall provide assessments and services free of charge to
families and maintain active membership in the National Assessment Center
Association.
(3) The purpose of the assessment shall be to (a) enable youth and
families to discuss a family's unique dynamic, challenges, and goals in a safe,
culturally respectful environment, (b) identify the origin of presenting issues
and provide comprehensive service referrals in partnership with local
-1-

LB48 LB48
2025 2025
organizations and businesses, and (c) engage youth and families in creating
tailored action plans for long-term success.
Sec. 6. (1) Each family resource and juvenile assessment center shall
integrate culturally relevant and trauma-informed services, including (a)
tutoring, (b) mentoring from community leaders, including those with lived
experience in the justice system, (c) conflict resolution and anger management
training, (d) mental health and wellness services provided by culturally
sensitive professionals, (e) social skills and job-readiness training, (f)
financial literacy programs, (g) youth and family counseling, (h) cognitive
behavioral therapy, (i) drug and substance abuse prevention and intervention,
and (j) food and clothing assistance and resource navigation.
(2) Each center shall establish community partnerships to provide
apprenticeships, vocational training, and mentorship opportunities with local
businesses, trades, and community organizations.
Sec. 7. Each family resource and juvenile assessment center shall (1)
have a youth advisory council and parent advisory board composed of community
members to provide ongoing feedback to ensure services remain relevant,
effective, and responsive, (2) host regular outreach events, workshops, and
open houses in partnership with schools, faith-based groups, and community
organizations, to create a bridge for preventive engagement with at-risk youth
and their families, and (3) employ individuals with established community ties
and lived experience to guide youth and families through available services,
act as mentors, and assist with follow-up to ensure sustained engagement.
Sec. 8. Each family resource and juvenile assessment center shall
implement a data collection system to assess program effectiveness, track youth
and family outcomes, and incorporate feedback directly from those served. The
data collected shall be used to adjust and refine services, with a focus on
measuring progress toward keeping youth out of the juvenile justice system and
achieving positive life outcomes.
Sec. 9. Each family resource and juvenile assessment center shall offer
ongoing support to youth after they complete the initial service period. This
support may include alumni mentoring programs, periodic check-ins, or
additional family resources as youth transition into adulthood or exit from
other systems of care.
Sec. 10. Funding for family resource and juvenile assessment centers
shall be allocated to prioritize partnerships with local grassroots
organizations and businesses to sustain services and provide direct community
investment. Subject to available funds, each designated center shall receive up
to five hundred thousand dollars per center annually from the Medicaid Managed
Care Excess Profit Fund. If such funds are not available from the Medicaid
Managed Care Excess Profit Fund, no General Funds may be used. No more than ten
percent of funds appropriated for the Family Resource and Juvenile Assessment
Center Pilot Program, up to fifty thousand dollars per year, shall be used to
administer the pilot program.
Sec. 11. The Department of Health and Human Services shall conduct an
annual evaluation of the Family Resource and Juvenile Assessment Center Pilot
Program's impact on youth and family well-being, community trust, and reduction
in juvenile justice system involvement to inform future program developments
under sections 1 to 11 of this act.
Sec. 12. Section 68-996, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
68-996 (1) The Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund is created. The
fund shall contain money returned to the State Treasurer pursuant to
subdivision (3) of section 68-995.
(2) The fund shall first be used to offset any losses under subdivision
(2) of section 68-995 and then to provide for (a) services addressing the
health needs of adults and children under the Medical Assistance Act, including
filling service gaps, (b) providing system improvements, (c) providing
evidence-based early intervention home visitation programs, (d) providing
medical respite services, (e) translation and interpretation services, (f)
providing coverage for continuous glucose monitors as described in section
68-911, (g) providing other services sustaining access to care, (h) services
under the Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program, (i) and providing grants pursuant to
the Intergenerational Care Facility Incentive Grant Program, and (j) the Family
Resource and Juvenile Assessment Center Pilot Program as determined by the
Legislature. The fund shall only be used for the purposes described in this
section.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any
investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to
the General Fund.
Sec. 13. This act becomes operative on September 1, 2025.
Sec. 14. Original section 68-996, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
-2-